Nebraska, session 109, LB443.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB443 LB443
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful squatting when
such person:
(a) Enters upon the land or premises of another and resides on such
land or premises for any period of time with the intent to claim
ownership of such land or premises or otherwise appropriate the property
of the rightful owner of such land or premises; and
(b) Knowingly enters upon such land or premises with such intent
without the knowledge or consent of the owner or rightful occupant or an
authorized representative of the owner or rightful occupant.
(2) If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe a
person has committed unlawful squatting, the officer shall issue such
person a warning citation. Conditions sufficient to establish probable
cause shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) The presence of persons or personal property on the land or
premises which show signs typical of abandonment or inoccupancy; or
(b) The construction of a shanty, tent, or other nonpermanent
structure upon the land or premises.
(3) The warning citation shall advise the recipient that within
three business days after receiving such warning citation, the recipient
shall appear in person before a designee of the officer's law enforcement
agency and present properly executed documentation authorizing the
recipient to reside on such land or premises. Proper documentation
includes, but is not limited to, a deed or title to the land or premises,
a properly executed rental agreement or other agreement, or proof of
rental payments. Original copies of proper documentation are not required
and the recipient may satisfy this subsection by providing photographic
-2-

LB443 LB443
2025 2025
or electronic copies of such documentation.
(4) If such person fails to appear and provide documentation as
provided in subsection (3) of this section or if such documentation is
not authentic or does not authorize such residency, such person shall be
subject to arrest for unlawful squatting and upon conviction shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-